Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6684HH (3) 91 jm/ns H.F. 2281 Section 1. Section 123.49, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Sell or dispense any alcoholic beverage on the 3 premises covered by the license, or permit its consumption 4 thereon between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m. on any day 5 of the week. This subparagraph does not apply during the time 6 period beginning one hour before a scheduled flight through the 7 end of boarding for the flight at a commercial service airport. 8 (2) For purposes of this paragraph, âcommercial service 9 airportâ means the same as defined in 49 U.S.C. Â§47102. 10